Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.101

Filing fee petition—Form.

(1) The filing fee petition authorized by RCW 29A.24.091 must be printed on sheets of uniform color and size, must include a place for each individual to sign and print his or her name and the address, city, and county at which he or she is registered to vote, and must contain no more than twenty numbered lines.

(2) The filing fee petition must be in substantially the following form:

The warning prescribed by RCW 29A.72.140; followed by:

We, the undersigned registered voters of (the state of Washington or the political subdivision for which the nomination is made) , hereby petition that the name of (candidate's name) be printed on the official primary ballot for the office of (insert name of office) .

[ 2013 c 11 s 32; 2006 c 206 s 4; 2004 c 271 s 114.]